Massachusetts, session 194th, S58.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following new
subsection:-
“(dd) (1) A taxpayer who donates oyster shells to an oyster shell recycling organization
shall be eligible for a credit against the taxes imposed by this chapter. The amount of the credit is
equal to five dollars per full 5 gallon bucket of oyster shells donated.
(2) The credit allowed under this subsection may not exceed the amount of tax imposed
by this chapter for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except tax
payment made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.
of 3

(3) Any amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried
forward by the taxpayer to any of the 3 subsequent taxable years.
(4) No deduction is allowed for the donation of oyster shells for which a credit is claimed
under this section.
(5) To support the credit allowed by this section, the taxpayer shall have available for
inspection a certification by the recipient organization stating the number of 5 gallon buckets of
oyster shells donated by the taxpayer for the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.”
SECTION 2. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 38MM the following new section:-
“Section 38NN. (a) A corporation subject to tax under this chapter that donates oyster
shells to an oyster shell recycling organization shall be eligible for a credit against its excise due
under this chapter. The amount of this credit is equal to five dollars per full 5 gallon bucket of
oyster shells donated.
(b) Any amount of the credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried
forward by the corporation to any of the 3 subsequent taxable years.
(c) No deduction is allowed for the donation of oyster shells for which a credit is claimed
under this section.
(d) The credit allowed in this chapter for any taxable year shall not reduce the excise to
less than the amount due under subsection (b) of section 39, section 67 or any other applicable
section.
of 3

(e) To support the credit allowed by this section, the corporation shall have available for
inspection a certification by the recipient organization stating the number of five gallon buckets
of oyster shells donated by the taxpayer for the taxable year in which the credit is claimed.”
of 3